Illinois, session 104th, HB5649.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 7Illinois State Police for the following purposes:8DIVISION OF JUSTICE SERVICES9Payable from General Revenue Fund:10  For Payment of Tort Claims...........................50,00011  For Refunds...........................................2,00012    Total                                             $52,00013Payable from the State Police Vehicle Fund:14  For purchase of vehicles and accessories,15   including prior years' costs....................30,000,000 16    Section 10. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Asset 18Forfeiture Fund to the Illinois State Police for payment of 19their expenditures as outlined in the Drug Asset Forfeiture 20Procedure Act, the Cannabis Control Act, and the Illinois 21Controlled Substances Act.   HB5649- 2 -OMB104 00210 MMV 10210 b1    Section 15. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal Asset 3Forfeiture Fund to the Illinois State Police for payment of 4their expenditures in accordance with the Federal Equitable 5Sharing Guidelines. 6    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 8the Illinois State Police for the following purposes:9DIVISION OF OPERATIONS10Payable from General Revenue Fund:11  For Personal Services...........................370,451,20012  For State Contributions to13   Social Security.................................12,216,10014  For Contractual Services.........................24,821,00015  For Travel..........................................432,70016  For Commodities...................................2,768,60017  For Printing........................................236,50018  For Equipment.....................................8,243,00019  For Electronic Data Processing...................16,312,20020  For Telecommunication Services...................16,419,00021  For Operation of Auto Equipment..................19,558,50022  For All Costs Associated with the Data 23   System Modernization and Replacement24   of Critical Information Technology Systems......3,000,000 25    Total                                        $474,458,800  HB5649- 3 -OMB104 00210 MMV 10210 b1Payable from the State Police Services Fund:2  For Payment of Expenses:3   Fingerprint Program.............................28,000,0004  For Payment of Expenses:5   Federal and Illinois Department6   of Transportation Programs.......................8,400,0007  For Payment of Expenses:8   Contractual Obligations and 9   Intergovernmental Agreements.....................1,500,00010  For Payment of Expenses:11   Miscellaneous Programs...........................8,000,00012  For Payment of Expenses:13   Clean Slate Act..................................5,601,30014    Total                                         $51,501,30015Payable from the Motor Carrier Safety Inspection Fund:16  For expenses associated with the17   enforcement of Federal Motor Carrier18   Safety Regulations and related19   Illinois Motor Carrier20   Safety Laws......................................2,600,00021Payable from the Compassionate Use of 22 Medical Cannabis Fund:23  For direct and indirect costs associated24   with the implementation, administration and25   enforcement of the Compassionate Use of26   Medical Cannabis Program Act.....................2,200,000  HB5649- 4 -OMB104 00210 MMV 10210 b1Payable from the Cannabis Regulation Fund:2  For direct and indirect costs3   associated with the implementation,4   administration and enforcement of the5   Adult-Use Cannabis Program.......................5,000,000 6    Section 25. The sum of $26,550,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Police 8Operations Assistance Fund to the Illinois State Police for 9the ordinary and contingent expenses incurred by the Illinois 10State Police. 11    Section 30. The sum of $25,000,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Police 13Operations Assistance Fund to the Illinois State Police for 14the ordinary and contingent expenses of state funded program 15expenses. 16    Section 35. The sum of $28,550,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Police Law 18Enforcement Administration Fund to the Illinois State Police, 19Division of Operations, for all costs associated with a cadet 20program for the Illinois State Police. 21    Section 40. The sum of $25,000,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois State   HB5649- 5 -OMB104 00210 MMV 10210 b1Police Federal Projects Fund to the Illinois State Police for 2costs related to federal awards and grants, including prior 3years' costs. 4    Section 45. The sum of $35,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois State 6Police Federal Projects Fund to the Illinois State Police for 7costs related to the Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program. 8    Section 50. The following named amounts, or so much 9thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 10the Illinois State Police for the following purposes:11DIVISION OF FORENSIC SERVICES AND IDENTIFICATION12Payable from the General Revenue Fund:13  For Administration of a Statewide Sexual14   Assault Evidence Collection Program.................55,30015  For Operational Expenses Related to the16   Combined DNA Index System........................2,142,10017    Total                                          $2,197,40018Payable from the State Crime Laboratory Fund:19  For Administration and Operation20   of State Crime Laboratories.....................15,000,000 21    Section 55. The sum of $2,250,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Mental Health 23Reporting Fund to the Illinois State Police, Division of   HB5649- 6 -OMB104 00210 MMV 10210 b1Forensic Services and Identification, for expenses as outlined 2in the Firearm Concealed Carry Act and the Firearm Owners 3Identification Card Act. 4    Section 60. The sum of $31,500,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Police 6Firearm Services Fund to the Illinois State Police for 7expenses as outlined in the Firearm Concealed Carry Act and 8the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. 9    Section 65. The sum of $230,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Statewide 9-1-1 11Fund to the Illinois State Police, Division of Justice 12Services, for costs pursuant to the Emergency Telephone System 13Act. 14    Section 70. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Illinois State Police, for the ordinary and 17contingent expenses of the Safe2Help Program. 18    Section 75. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Facility 20Repair and Maintenance Fund to the Department of Illinois 21State Police for repairs, maintenance, and other permanent 22improvements.   HB5649- 7 -OMB104 00210 MMV 10210 b1    Section 80. No contract shall be entered into or 2obligation incurred or any expenditure made from any 3appropriation herein made in Section 75 of this Article until 4after the purpose and amounts have been approved in writing by 5the Governor. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 72026.